Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.680

[Art. 90] Assaulting or willfully disobeying superior commissioned officer.

Any person subject to this code who:

(1) Strikes his or her superior commissioned officer or draws or lifts up any weapon or offers any violence against him or her while he or she is in the execution of his or her office; or

(2) Willfully disobeys a lawful command of his or her superior commissioned officer;

shall be punished as a court martial may direct.

[ 2011 c 336 s 780; 1963 c 220 s 89.]